fi: Silmukkamerkki ja laskurityyli: Päärynähakaneula; Napsautettava kerroslaskuri; Suljettu silmukkamerkki; Kierre-/neulamerkki; Digitaalinen kerroslaskuri; Lukittava silmukkamerkki; Manuaalinen kerroslaskuri (rulla); Edistymismerkki; Sormuskerroslaskuri; Avoin silmukkamerkki; Muu
pl: Styl znacznika i licznika rzędów: Marker typu żarówka/agrafka; Kliker; Zamknięty pierścień; Marker ze sprężynką / szpilką; Cyfrowy licznik rzędów; Zapinany na klips; Ręczny licznik rzędów (obrotowy); Znacznik postępów (Progress keeper); Pierścionkowy licznik rzędów; Rozdzielony pierścień; Inny
sv: Stygnmarkörs- och räknarstil: Päronformad säkerhetsnål; Klickräknare (tally); Stängd markörring; Spiral-/stickmarkör; Digital varvräknare; Låsbar markör (clips); Manuell varvräknare (vridbar); Framstegsmarkör; Varvräknarring; Öppen markörring; Övrigt
ko: 스티치 마커 및 카운터 방식: 전구(표주박) 옷핀 마커; 클릭 카운터(계수기); 닫힌 링 마커; 코일/핀 마커; 디지털 단수 카운터; 잠금(클립) 마커; 수동 단수 카운터(다이얼); 프로그레스 키퍼; 링 단수 카운터; 스플릿 링 마커; 기타
ja: ステッチマーカー/カウンタースタイル: ひょうたん型安全ピンマーカー; クリックカウンター (数取器); クローズドリングマーカー; コイル/ピンマーカー; デジタル段数マーカー; ロッキング (クリップ) マーカー; 手動段数カウンター (ダイヤル式); プログレスキーパー; リング段数カウンター; スプリットリングマーカー; その他
nb: Maskemarkør og tellerstil: Pæreformet maskemarkør (sikkerhetsnål); Klikkteller; Lukket ringmarkør; Spiral- / pinnemarkør; Digital omgangsteller; Låsbar markør; Manuell omgangsteller (hjul); Fremdriftsmarkør; Ringbasert omgangsteller; Åpen ringmarkør; Annet
cs: Styl značkovače a počítadla stehů: Značkovač typu zavíracího špendlíku s baňkou (bulb/gourd); Mechanické počítadlo řad; Značkovač typu uzavřeného kroužku; Značkovač typu spirály / špendlíku; Digitální počítadlo řad; Zamykací značkovač oček; Otočné počítadlo řad; Značkovač postupu pletení; Kroužkové počítadlo řad; Značkovač typu otevřeného kroužku; Jiné
pt-PT: Estilo de marcadores e contadores de pontos: Marcador tipo alfinete de dama em bolbo (cabaça); Contador de cliques; Marcador de anel fechado; Marcador em espiral/alfinete; Contador de carreiras digital; Marcador com bloqueio (mola); Contador de carreiras manual (botão rotativo); Marcador de progresso; Contador de carreiras em anel; Marcador de anel aberto; Outro
pt-BR: Marcador de ponto e contador estilo: Marcador tipo alfinete de segurança pera; Contador de cliques (tally); Marcador de anel fechado; Marcador espiral/alfinete; Contador digital de carreiras; Marcador com trava (clipe); Contador manual de carreiras (dial); Marcador de progresso; Contador de carreiras tipo anel; Marcador de anel aberto; Outro
ru: Стиль маркера и счетчика петель: Булавка-маркер в форме груши (лампочки); Механический счетчик (кликер); Маркер-кольцо (закрытый); Спиралевидный маркер/булавка; Электронный счетчик рядов; Маркер с замочком (клипса); Ручной счетчик рядов (барабанный); Маркер прогресса; Счетчик рядов на кольце; Разъемный маркер-кольцо; Другое
sl-SI: Označevalec in števec šivov: Varnostna zaponka v obliki žarnice (buče); Klik števec; Zaprt obroček; Spiralni označevalec/zaponka; Digitalni števec vrst; Označevalec z zaklepom (sponka); Ročni števec vrst (vrtljivi); Označevalec napredka; Števec vrst v obliki prstana; Odprt obroček; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ značkovača a počítadla stehov: Zatvárací špendlík v tvare žiarovky/hrušky; Klikacie počítadlo (ručné); Zatvorený krúžok; Špirálový/špendlíkový označovač; Digitálne počítadlo riadkov; Uzatvárateľný označovač (spona); Manuálne počítadlo riadkov (otočné); Značkovač postupu; Prstencové počítadlo riadkov; Otvorený krúžok; Iné
bg-BG: Стил на маркер и брояч за бримки: Маркер тип безопасна игла (круша); Механичен брояч (с кликване); Маркер със затворен пръстен; Маркер тип спирала/игла; Цифров брояч на редове; Заключващ се (клипс) маркер; Ръчен брояч на редове (с циферблат); Маркер за напредък; Брояч на редове тип пръстен; Маркер с отворен пръстен; Друго
ro-RO: Stil de marcator de ochiuri și numărător: Marcator tip ac de siguranță formă de bec (tărtăcuță); Contor cu clic (tally); Marcator tip inel închis; Marcator spirală/ac; Contor de rânduri digital; Marcator cu închidere (clemă); Contor de rânduri manual (cadran); Indicator de progres; Contor de rânduri tip inel; Marcator tip inel despicat; Altele
de: Art des Maschenmarkierers bzw. Reihenzählers: Sicherheitsnadel-Markierer (Birnenform); Klick-Zähler; Geschlossener Ring-Markierer; Spiral-/Nadel-Markierer; Digitaler Reihenzähler; Verschließbarer (Clip) Markierer; Manueller Reihenzähler (Drehscheibe); Fortschrittsmarkierer; Ring-Reihenzähler; Spaltring-Markierer; Andere
es: Marcador de puntadas y estilo de contador: Marcador de imperdible tipo bombilla; Contador de clics; Marcador de anillo cerrado; Marcador de espiral/alfiler; Contador de hileras digital; Marcador con bloqueo (clip); Contador de hileras manual (dial); Marcador de progreso; Contador de hileras de anillo; Marcador de anillo abierto; Otro
th: รูปแบบหรือขนาดของเครื่องหมายบอกตำแหน่งตะเข็บและตัวนับจำนวนตะเข็บ/แถว: มาร์คเกอร์เข็มกลัดทรงหลอดไฟ (น้ำเต้า); เครื่องนับจำนวนแบบกด; มาร์คเกอร์แบบห่วงปิด; มาร์คเกอร์แบบขดเกลียว/เข็มหมุด; เครื่องนับแถวดิจิทัล; มาร์คเกอร์แบบคลิปล็อก; เครื่องนับแถวแบบหมุน; ตัวเก็บความคืบหน้า; เครื่องนับแถวแบบห่วง; มาร์คเกอร์แบบห่วงเกลียว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Marker i brojač šavova: Oznaka sa sigurnosnom iglom u obliku žarulje; Klik-brojač; Oznaka sa zatvorenim prstenom; Oznaka u obliku spirale/igle; Digitalni brojač redova; Oznaka za zaključavanje (kopča); Ručni brojač redova (brojčanik); Oznaka za praćenje napretka (progress keeper); Brojač redova u obliku prstena; Oznaka s razdvojenim prstenom; Ostalo
fr: Type de marqueur de mailles ou de compteur: Marqueur à épingle à nourrice ampoule; Compteur à clic (manuel); Marqueur à anneau fermé; Marqueur à spirale/épingle; Compte-rangs numérique; Marqueur verrouillable (clip); Compte-rangs manuel (cadran); Marqueur de progression; Compte-rangs bague; Marqueur à anneau brisé; Autre
zh-TW: 記號圈和計數器樣式: 燈泡 (葫蘆) 型安全別針記號圈; 按壓式計數器 (計數); 閉環記號圈; 線圈/別針記號圈; 數位段數計數器; 鎖扣 (夾式) 記號圈; 手動段數計數器 (轉盤); 進度記號圈; 戒指型段數計數器; 開口環記號圈; 其他
tr: İlmek işaretleyici ve sayaç stili: Ampul (kabak) şeklinde çengelli iğne ilmek işaretleyici; Tıklamalı sayaç; Kapalı halka ilmek işaretleyici; Sarmal/iğneli ilmek işaretleyici; Dijital sıra sayacı; Kilitli (klipsli) ilmek işaretleyici; Manuel sıra sayacı (kadranlı); İlerleme takipçisi; Yüzük şeklinde sıra sayacı; Açık halka ilmek işaretleyici; Diğer
zh-CN: 记号扣与计数器样式: 葫芦形安全别针记号扣; 按动计数器（计数）; 闭环记号扣; 线圈/别针记号扣; 数字行计数器; 锁扣（夹子）记号扣; 手动行计数器（表盘）; 进度标记扣; 戒指行计数器; 开口环记号扣; 其他
hu: Szemjelölő és számláló típusa: Villanykörte alakú biztosítótűs jelölő; Kattintós számláló; Zárt karikás jelölő; Spirálos/tűs jelölő; Digitális sorszámláló; Zárható (csipeszes) jelölő; Kézi sorszámláló (tárcsás); Haladásjelző; Gyűrűs sorszámláló; Nyitott karikás jelölő; Egyéb
nl: Steekmarkeerder en teller stijl: Veiligheidsspeldmarkeerder (peervormig); Klikteller (turfteller); Gesloten ringmarkeerder; Spiraal-/speldmarkeerder; Digitale toerenteller; Vergrendelbare markeerder (clip); Handmatige toerenteller (draaiknop); Voortgangsmarkeerder; Ring-toerenteller; Open ringmarkeerder; Overig
it: Stile del segnapunti e del contatore: Segnapunti a spilla da balia a bulbo (zucca); Contagiri a scatto (tally); Segnapunti ad anello chiuso; Segnapunti a spirale/spillo; Contagiri digitale; Segnapunti a lucchetto (clip); Contagiri manuale (quadrante); Segnapunti di progresso; Contagiri ad anello; Segnapunti ad anello aperto; Altro
lt-LT: Akių žymeklio ir eilių skaitiklio tipas: Kriaušės formos žiogelis; Spaudžiamas skaitiklis; Uždaro žiedo formos žymeklis; Spiralinis / smeigtuko formos žymeklis; Skaitmeninis eilių skaitiklis; Užrakinamas (segamas) žymeklis; Rankinis eilių skaitiklis (sukamas); Eigos žymeklis; Žiedinis eilių skaitiklis; Atviro žiedo formos žymeklis; Kita
da: Stil for maskemarkør og omgangstæller: Pæreformet maskemarkør (sikkerhedsnål); Omgangstæller med klik; Lukket ringmarkør; Spiral/nålemarkør; Digital omgangstæller; Låsbar markør (clips); Manuel omgangstæller (drejeskive); Fremskridtsmarkør; Omgangstæller (ring); Splitring-markør; Andet
en: Stitch marker and counter style: Bulb (gourd) safety pin marker; Click counter (tally); Closed ring marker; Coil/pin marker; Digital row counter; Locking (clip) marker; Manual row counter (dial); Progress keeper; Ring row counter; Split ring marker; Other
vi: Kiểu đánh dấu mũi khâu và kiểu đếm: Kim đánh dấu hình bóng đèn (quả bầu); Máy đếm bấm nút (tally); Vòng đánh dấu khép kín; Đánh dấu dạng cuộn/kim; Máy đếm hàng điện tử; Kim đánh dấu có khóa (dạng kẹp); Bộ đếm hàng thủ công (dạng xoay); Bộ theo dõi tiến độ; Bộ đếm hàng dạng vòng; Vòng đánh dấu hở; Khác
el: Τύπος δείκτη και μετρητή πόντων: Δείκτης παραμάνα σε σχήμα λάμπας; Μετρητής με κουμπί (clicker); Δείκτης κλειστός κρίκος; Δείκτης σπιράλ/καρφίτσα; Ψηφιακός μετρητής σειρών; Δείκτης με κλείδωμα (κλιπ); Χειροκίνητος μετρητής σειρών (με ροδέλα); Δείκτης προόδου; Μετρητής σειρών δαχτυλίδι; Δείκτης ανοιχτός κρίκος; Άλλο